Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.530 and 2021 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a)(i) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the county voters at a special or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under this section may not exceed ((one-tenth of one))0.1 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(ii) As an alternative to the authority provided in (a)(i) of this subsection, a county legislative authority may impose, without a proposition approved by a majority of persons voting, a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The rate of tax under this section may not exceed ((one-tenth of one))0.1 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(b)(i) If a county does not impose the full tax rate authorized under (a) of this subsection by September 30, 2020, any city legislative authority located in that county may:(A) Submit an authorizing proposition to the city voters at a special or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose the whole or remainder of the sales and use tax rate in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used; or(B) Impose, without a proposition approved by a majority of persons voting, the whole or remainder of the sales and use tax rate in accordance with the terms of this chapter.(ii) The rate of tax under this section may not exceed ((one-tenth of one))0.1 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(iii) A county with a population of greater than ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 may impose the tax authorized under (a)(ii) of this subsection only if the county plans to spend at least ((thirty))30 percent of the moneys collected under this section that are attributable to taxable activities or events within any city with a population greater than ((sixty thousand))60,000 located in that county within that city's boundaries.(c) If a county imposes a tax authorized under (a) of this subsection after a city located in that county has imposed the tax authorized under (b) of this subsection, the county must provide a credit against its tax for the full amount of tax imposed by a city.(d) The taxes authorized in this subsection are in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county for a county's tax and within a city for a city's tax.(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, a minimum of ((sixty))60 percent of the moneys collected under this section must be used for the following purposes:(i) Constructing or acquiring affordable housing, which may include emergency, transitional, and supportive housing and new units of affordable housing within an existing structure, and facilities providing housing-related services, or acquiring land for these purposes; or(ii) Constructing or acquiring behavioral health-related facilities, or acquiring land for these purposes; or(iii) Funding the operations and maintenance costs of new and existing units of affordable housing and facilities where housing-related programs are provided, or newly constructed evaluation and treatment centers; or(iv) Rehabilitating existing affordable housing, which may include emergency, transitional, and supportive housing.(b) The affordable housing and facilities providing housing-related programs in (a)(i) of this subsection may only be provided to persons within any of the following population groups whose income is at or below ((sixty))60 percent of the median income of the county imposing the tax:(i) Persons with behavioral health disabilities;(ii) Veterans;(iii) Senior citizens;(iv) Persons who are homeless or at-risk of being homeless, including families with children;(v) Unaccompanied homeless youth or young adults;(vi) Persons with disabilities; or(vii) Domestic violence survivors.(c) The remainder of the moneys collected under this section must be used for ((the)):(i) The operation, delivery, or evaluation of behavioral health treatment programs and services, affordable and supportive housing operation and maintenance, or housing-related services; or(ii) Rental assistance.(3)(a) A county that imposes the tax under this section must consult with a city before the county may construct or acquire any of the facilities authorized under subsection (2)(a) of this section within the city limits.(b) Among other priorities, a county that acquires a facility under subsection (2)(a) of this section must provide an opportunity for 15 percent of the units provided at that facility to be provided to individuals who are living in or near the city in which the facility is located, or have ties to that community. The provisions of this subsection (3)(b) do not apply if the county is unable to identify sufficient individuals within the city in need of services that meet the criteria provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section. This prioritization must not jeopardize United States department of housing and urban development funding for the continuum of care program.(4) A county that has not imposed the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.460 prior to October 9, 2015, but imposes the tax authorized under this section after a city in that county has imposed the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.460 prior to October 9, 2015, must ((enter into an interlocal agreement))consult with that city to determine how the services and provisions described in subsection (2) of this section will be allocated and funded in the city.(5) To carry out the purposes of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section, the legislative authority of the county or city imposing the tax has the authority to issue general obligation or revenue bonds within the limitations now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of this state, and may use, and is authorized to pledge, up to ((fifty))50 percent of the moneys collected under this section for repayment of such bonds, in order to finance the provision or construction of affordable housing, facilities where housing-related programs are provided, or evaluation and treatment centers described in subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section.(6)(a) Moneys collected under this section may be used to offset reductions in state or federal funds for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section.(b) No more than ((ten))10 percent of the moneys collected under this section may be used to supplant existing local funds.(7) A county or city may enter into an interlocal agreement with one or more counties, cities, or public housing authorities in accordance with chapter 39.34 RCW. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, pooling the tax receipts received under this section, pledging those taxes to bonds issued by one or more parties to the agreement, and allocating the proceeds of the taxes levied or the bonds issued in accordance with such interlocal agreement and this section.Sec. 2. RCW 82.14.540 and 2024 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Nonparticipating city" is a city that does not impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(b) "Nonparticipating county" is a county that does not impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(c) "Participating city" is a city that imposes a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(d) "Participating county" is a county that imposes a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(e) "Qualifying local tax" means the following tax sources, if the tax source is instated no later than ((twelve))12 months after July 28, 2019:(i) The affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105;(ii) The sales and use tax for housing and related services authorized under RCW 82.14.530, provided the city has imposed the tax at a minimum or of at least half of the authorized rate;(iii) The sales tax for chemical dependency and mental health treatment services or therapeutic courts authorized under RCW 82.14.460 imposed by a city; and(iv) The levy authorized under RCW 84.55.050, if used solely for affordable housing.(2)(a) A county or city legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(b) The tax under this section is assessed on the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(c) The rate of the tax under this section for an individual participating city and an individual participating county may not exceed:(i) Beginning on July 28, 2019, until ((twelve))12 months after July 28, 2019:(A) 0.0073 percent for a:(I) Participating city, unless the participating city levies a qualifying local tax; and(II) Participating county, within the limits of nonparticipating cities within the county and within participating cities that do not currently levy a qualifying tax;(B) 0.0146 percent for a:(I) Participating city that currently levies a qualifying local tax;(II) Participating city if the county in which it is located declares they will not levy the sales and use tax authorized under this section or does not adopt a resolution in accordance with this section; and(III) Participating county within the unincorporated areas of the county and any city that declares they will not levy the sales and use tax authorized under this section or does not adopt a resolution in accordance with this section;(ii) Beginning ((twelve))12 months after July 28, 2019:(A) 0.0073 percent for a:(I) Participating city that is located within a participating county if the participating city is not levying a qualifying local tax; and(II) Participating county, within the limits of a participating city if the participating city is not levying a qualifying local tax;(B) 0.0146 percent within the limits of a:(I) Participating city that is levying a qualifying local tax; and(II) Participating county within the unincorporated area of the county and within the limits of any nonparticipating city that is located within the county.(d) A county may not levy the tax authorized under this section within the limits of a participating city that levies a qualifying local tax.(e)(i) In order for a county or city legislative authority to impose the tax under this section, the authority must adopt:(A) A resolution of intent to adopt legislation to authorize the maximum capacity of the tax in this section within six months of July 28, 2019; and(B) Legislation to authorize the maximum capacity of the tax in this section within one year of July 28, 2019.(ii) Adoption of the resolution of intent and legislation requires simple majority approval of the enacting legislative authority.(iii) If a county or city has not adopted a resolution of intent in accordance with the terms of this section, the county or city may not authorize, fix, and impose the tax.(3) The tax imposed under this section must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county or city at no cost to the county or city.(4) By December 31, 2019, or within ((thirty))30 days of a county or city authorizing the tax under this section, whichever is later, the department must calculate the maximum amount of tax distributions for each county and city authorizing the tax under this section as follows:(a) The maximum amount for a participating county equals the taxable retail sales within the county in state fiscal year 2019 multiplied by the tax rate imposed under this section. If a county imposes a tax authorized under this section after a city located in that county has imposed the tax, the taxable retail sales within the city in state fiscal year 2019 must be subtracted from the taxable retail sales within the county for the calculation of the maximum amount; and(b) The maximum amount for a city equals the taxable retail sales within the city in state fiscal year 2019 multiplied by the tax rate imposed under subsection (1) of this section.(5) The tax must cease to be distributed to a county or city for the remainder of any fiscal year in which the amount of tax exceeds the maximum amount in subsection (4) of this section. The department must remit any annual tax revenues above the maximum to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund. Distributions to a county or city meeting the maximum amount must resume at the beginning of the next fiscal year.(6)(a) The moneys collected or bonds issued under this section may only be used for the following purposes:(i) Acquiring, rehabilitating, or constructing affordable housing, which may include new units of affordable housing within an existing structure or facilities providing supportive housing services under RCW 71.24.385;(ii) Funding the operations and maintenance costs of new and existing units of affordable or supportive housing; or(iii) For providing rental assistance to tenants.(b) Administrative costs of the county or city associated with administering this section may not exceed 10 percent of the annual tax distributed to the jurisdiction under this section.(7) The housing and services provided pursuant to subsection (6) of this section may only be provided to persons whose income is at or below 60 percent of the median income of the county or city imposing the tax, or at or below 80 percent of the median income of the county or city imposing the tax if it is supporting the development of affordable housing intended for owner occupancy, as defined in RCW 84.14.010.(8) In determining the use of funds under subsection (6) of this section, a county or city must consider the income of the individuals and families to be served, the leveraging of the resources made available under this section, and the housing needs within the jurisdiction of the taxing authority.(9) To carry out the purposes of this section including, but not limited to, financing loans or grants to nonprofit organizations or public housing authorities, the legislative authority of the county or city imposing the tax has the authority to issue general obligation or revenue bonds within the limitations now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of this state, and may use, and is authorized to pledge, the moneys collected under this section for repayment of such bonds.(10) A county or city may enter into an interlocal agreement with one or more counties, cities, or public housing authorities in accordance with chapter 39.34 RCW. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, pooling the tax receipts received under this section, pledging those taxes to bonds issued by one or more parties to the agreement, and allocating the proceeds of the taxes levied or the bonds issued in accordance with such interlocal agreement and this section.(11) Counties and cities imposing the tax under this section must report annually to the department of commerce on the collection and use of the revenue. The department of commerce must adopt rules prescribing content of such reports. By December 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department of commerce must submit a report annually to the appropriate legislative committees with regard to such uses.(12) The tax imposed by a county or city under this section expires ((twenty))20 years after the date on which the tax is first imposed.Sec. 3. RCW 36.22.250 and 2025 c 408 s 3, 2025 c 100 s 2, and 2025 c 74 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) A surcharge of $183 per instrument shall be charged by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge authorized by law. The following are exempt from this surcharge:(a) Documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death;(b) Any recorded documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee or additional surcharges under state law;(c) Marriage licenses issued by the county auditor; and(d) Documents recording a federal, state, county, city, or water-sewer district, or wage lien or satisfaction of lien.(2) Funds collected pursuant to this section must be distributed and used as follows:(a) One percent of the total funds collected shall be retained by the county auditor for its fee collection activities;(b) 30 percent of the total funds collected shall be retained by the county and used by the county as provided in subsection (3) of this section;(c) 54.1 percent of the total funds collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be deposited in the home security fund account created in RCW 43.185C.060 and shall be used by the department of commerce as provided in subsection (4) of this section;(d) 13.1 percent of the total funds collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be deposited in the affordable housing for all account created in RCW 43.185C.190 and shall be used by the department of commerce as provided in subsection (5) of this section;(e) 1.8 percent of the total funds collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be deposited in the landlord mitigation program account created in RCW 43.31.615 and shall be used by the department of commerce as provided in subsection (6) of this section.(3) The county shall use their portion of the collected funds as follows:(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, up to 10 percent for the county's administration and local distribution of the funds collected from the surcharge in this section, and administrative costs related to the county's homeless housing plan;(b)(i) At least 75 percent will be retained and used by the county to accomplish the purposes of its local homeless housing plan pursuant to chapter 484, Laws of 2005, unless a city in the county elects, as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080, to operate its own local homeless housing program.(ii) If a city in the county elects, as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080, to operate its own local homeless housing program, the 10 percent for administrative costs retained under (a) of this subsection and the 75 percent for local homeless housing plans retained under (b) of this subsection must be combined and distributed as follows: For each city in the county that elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under this subsection equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the real estate excise tax collected by the county shall be transmitted at least quarterly to the city treasurer, without any deduction for county administrative costs, for use by the city for program costs which directly contribute to the goals of the city's local homeless housing plan. Each county or city receiving funds under this subsection (3) may use up to 10 percent of their share of the total funding retained or received under this subsection (3) after the completion of the required city distributions for costs related to:(A) The county's administration and local distribution of the funds collected from the surcharge in this section;(B) Administrative costs related to the county's homeless housing plan; and(C) Administrative costs related to the city's homeless housing program;(c) At least 15 percent will be retained and used by the county for eligible housing activities, as described in this subsection, that serve extremely low and very low-income households in the county and the cities within a county according to an interlocal agreement between the county and the cities within the county consistent with countywide and local housing needs and policies. A priority must be given to eligible housing activities that serve extremely low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income. Eligible housing activities to be funded are limited to:(i) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income, including units for homeownership, rental units, seasonal and permanent farmworker housing units, units reserved for victims of human trafficking and their families, and single room occupancy units;(ii) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing projects or units within housing projects eligible to receive housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses;(iii) Rental assistance vouchers for housing units that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income, including rental housing vouchers for victims of human trafficking and their families, to be administered by a local public housing authority or other local organization that has an existing rental assistance voucher program, consistent with or similar to the United States department of housing and urban development's section 8 rental assistance voucher program standards; and(iv) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight youth shelters.(4) The department of commerce shall use the funds from the document recording fee or other fund sources deposited in the home security fund account as follows, except that the department of commerce shall provide counties with the right of first refusal to receive grant funds distributed under (b) of this subsection (4). If a county refuses the funds or does not respond within a time frame established by the department, the department shall make good faith efforts to identify one or more suitable alternative grantees operating within that county. The alternative grantee shall distribute the funds in a manner that is in compliance with this chapter. Funding provided through the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs created in RCW 43.330.705 is exempt from the county first refusal requirement.(a) Up to 10 percent for administration of the programs established in chapter 43.185C RCW and in conformance with this subsection (4), including the costs of creating and implementing strategic plans, collecting and evaluating data, measuring and reporting performance, providing technical assistance to local governments, providing training to entities delivering services, and developing and maintaining stakeholder relationships;(b) At least 90 percent for homelessness assistance grant programs administered by the department, including but not limited to: Temporary rental assistance; eviction prevention rental assistance per RCW 43.185C.185; emergency shelter and transitional housing operations and maintenance; outreach; diversion; HOPE and crisis residential centers; young adult housing; homeless services and case management for adult, family, youth, and young adult homeless populations and those at risk of homelessness; project-based vouchers for nonprofit housing providers or public housing authorities; tenant-based rent assistance; housing services; direct cash assistance as provided for in RCW 43.185C.220(5)(a); rapid rehousing; emergency housing; acquisition; operations; maintenance; and service costs for permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 for individuals with disabilities. Grantees may also use these funds in partnership with permanent supportive housing programs administered by the office of apple health and homes created in RCW 43.330.181. Priority for use must be given to purposes intended to house persons who are chronically homeless or to maintain housing for individuals with disabilities and prior experiences of homelessness, including families with children.(5) The department of commerce shall use the funds from the document recording fee or other fund sources deposited in the affordable housing for all account as follows:(a) Up to 10 percent for program administration and technical assistance necessary for the delivery programs and activities under this subsection (5);(b) At least 90 percent for the following:(i) Grants for building operation and maintenance costs of housing projects, or units within housing projects, that are in the state's housing trust fund portfolio((,))and are affordable to extremely low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income((, and require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses))at the time of move-in;(ii) Grants to support the building operations, maintenance, and supportive service costs for permanent supportive housing projects, or units within housing projects, that have received or will receive funding from the housing trust fund or other public capital funding programs. The supported projects or units must be dedicated as permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030((,))and be occupied by extremely low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income((, and require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operations, maintenance, and supportive services expenses))at the time of move-in. Eligible uses of grant funds under this subsection (5)(b)(ii) include, but are not limited to:(A) Resident services, such as programming, community events, and building activities, including meals and supplies;(B) Essential ancillary services necessary to assist program participants who are not covered or are partially covered by medicaid or other health insurance obtain and maintain housing. These services may include, but are not limited to, annual assessments of services, case management, education services, employment assistance and job training, counseling, life skills training, mental health services, outpatient health services, outreach, substance use treatment, transportation, and other support services;(C) Resident needs for basic living and well-being, such as hygiene products, housewares, and food; essential household goods; and transportation support for health care, treatment, and case management;(D) Essential maintenance and upkeep, including repair and replacement of fixtures needed for basic building functionality and occupational safety, such as lighting, security systems, locks and key systems, and window and door hardware; and required operational replacement reserves; and(E) Essential case management and other resources with demonstrable connection to resident well-being and housing stability, such as communal information technology hardware and software for resource navigation and telehealth appointments, 24/7 security and safety staff, and on-call resident emergency response.(6) The department of commerce shall use the funds from the document recording fee or other fund sources deposited in the landlord mitigation program account to administer the landlord mitigation program as established in RCW 43.31.605. The department of commerce may use up to 10 percent of these funds for program administration and the development and maintenance of a database necessary to administer the program.(7) When awarding grants under subsection (5)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, the department of commerce:(a) May not impose a cap on administrative or overhead costs for grantees of less than 15 percent of the grant award; and(b) Shall seek to promote continuity of operations and stability for existing projects including by maintaining renewal grant amounts at levels sufficient to support ongoing operations.(8) The department of commerce shall require grantees to maintain supporting documentation for all expenses over $50. The department may not require submission of supporting documentation before approving reimbursement requests except for cause or auditing purposes.Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.043 and 2023 sp.s. c 1 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The real and personal property used by a nonprofit organization in providing emergency or transitional housing for low-income homeless persons as defined in RCW 35.21.685 or 36.32.415 or victims of domestic violence who are homeless for personal safety reasons is exempt from taxation if:(a) The charge, if any, for the housing does not exceed the actual cost of operating and maintaining the housing; and(b)(i) The property is owned by the nonprofit organization; or(ii) The property is rented or leased by the nonprofit organization and the benefit of the exemption inures to the nonprofit organization.(2) The real and personal property used by a nonprofit organization in maintaining an approved recovery residence registered under RCW 41.05.760 is exempt from taxation if:(a) The charge for the housing does not exceed the actual cost of operating and maintaining the housing; and(b)(i) The property is owned by the nonprofit organization; or(ii) The property is rented or leased by the nonprofit organization and the benefit of the exemption inures to the nonprofit organization.(3) As used in this section:(a) "Homeless" means persons, including families, who, on one particular day or night, do not have decent and safe shelter nor sufficient funds to purchase or rent a place to stay.(b) "Emergency housing" ((means a project that provides housing and supportive services to homeless persons or families for up to sixty days))has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.(c) "Transitional housing" means a project that provides housing and supportive services to homeless persons or families for up to two years and that has as its purpose facilitating the movement of homeless persons and families into independent living.(d) "Recovery residence" has the same meaning as under RCW 41.05.760.(4) The exemption in subsection (2) of this section applies to taxes levied for collection in calendar years 2024 through 2033.(5) This exemption is subject to the administrative provisions contained in RCW 84.36.800 through 84.36.865.--- END ---